Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. Financial Provisions.

Sec. 44.88.088.
Payment of dividend to state.

The authority shall adopt a policy for payment of a dividend from the revolving fund, the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund ( AS

44.88.660

), and the Arctic infrastructure development fund ( AS

44.88.810

) to the state each fiscal year. The dividends for a fiscal year shall be made available by the authority before the end of that fiscal year. The authority shall notify the commissioner of revenue when the dividends for a fiscal year are available for appropriation. The amount of the dividend payable from the

revolving fund for a fiscal year may not be less than 25 percent nor more than 50 percent of the net income of the revolving fund for the base fiscal year; however, in no event, may the dividend payable from the revolving fund for a fiscal year exceed the total unrestricted net income of the revolving fund for the base year;

Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund ( AS

44.88.660

) for a fiscal year may not be less than 25 percent nor more than 50 percent of the net income of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund for the base fiscal year; however, the dividend payable from the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund for a fiscal year may not exceed the total unrestricted net income of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund for the base year;

Arctic infrastructure development fund ( AS

44.88.810

) for a fiscal year may not be less than 25 percent nor more than 50 percent of the net income of the Arctic infrastructure development fund for the base fiscal year; however, the dividend payable from the Arctic infrastructure development fund for a fiscal year may not exceed the total unrestricted net income of the Arctic infrastructure development fund for the base year.

In this section,

“base fiscal year” means the fiscal year ending two years before the end of the fiscal year in which the payment is made;

“mark-to-market fair value” means fixing the value of an investment as its market value as of the financial reporting date;

“net income” means the change in net position, or the equivalent term under generally accepted accounting principles, of the revolving fund, the change in net position of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund ( AS

44.88.660

), or the change in net position of the Arctic infrastructure development fund ( AS

44.88.810

) as set out in the audited financial statements of the authority for the base fiscal year, excluding amounts attributable to intergovernmental transfers, capital contributions, grants, losses on a project or development to the extent financed with state or federal grants or appropriations, mark-to-market fair value based accounting entries, and noncash accounting entries related to retirement obligations;

“project or development” means

an Arctic infrastructure development;

a development project;

a project; or

a qualified energy development;

“unrestricted net income” means the unrestricted change in net position, or the equivalent term under generally accepted accounting principles, of the revolving fund, the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund ( AS

44.88.660

), or the Arctic infrastructure development fund ( AS

44.88.810

) as set out in the audited financial statements of the authority for the base fiscal year, excluding amounts attributable to intergovernmental transfers, capital contributions, grants, losses on a project or development to the extent financed with state or federal grants or appropriations, mark-to-market fair value based accounting entries, and noncash accounting entries related to retirement obligations.

History.

(§ 3 ch 111 SLA 1996; am §§ 2, 3 ch 121 SLA 2002; am §§ 1, 2 ch 75 SLA 2003; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 26 SLA 2013; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 93 SLA 2014; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 64 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraphs (b)(2) and (4) were enacted as (4) and (5); renumbered in 2018 to maintain alphabetical order, at which time other paragraphs were also renumbered.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective May 30, 2013, in the introductory language in (a), in the first sentence, inserted “from the revolving fund and a dividend from the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund (AS

44.88.660

)”; deleted the second and third sentences, which pertained to calculation of the amount of the dividend for a fiscal year; inserted “The amount of the dividend payable from the” at the end of the introductory language, and made stylistic changes; added (a)(1) and (2); in (b)(2) [now (b)(3)] substituted “the change in net position, or the equivalent term under generally accepted accounting principles, of the revolving fund or the change in net position of the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund (AS

44.88.660

)” for “the authority’s change in net assets”; in (b)(3) [now (b)(5)] substituted “the unrestricted change in net position, or the equivalent term under generally accepted accounting principles, of the revolving fund or the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable energy transmission and supply development fund (AS 33.88.660)” for “the authority’s unrestricted change in net assets”; in the introductory language in (d), twice substituted “chair” for “chairman”; added (d)(4), and made stylistic changes throughout.

The 2014 amendment, effective October 14, 2014, in (a), in the introductory language, deleted “and a dividend from” following “revolving fund,” and inserted “, and the Arctic infrastructure development fund (AS

44.88.810

)” preceding “to the state each fiscal year.”, in (a)(2), deleted “in no event, shall” preceding “the dividend payable”, and inserted “may not” preceding “exceed the total unrestricted net income”, added (a)(3); in (b), in (b)(2) [now (b)(3)], inserted “, or the change in net position of the Arctic infrastructure development fund (AS

44.88.810

)” preceding “as set out in the audited financial statements”, in (b)(3) [now (b)(5)], inserted “, or the Arctic infrastructure development fund (AS 44.88.810)” preceding “as set out in the audited financial statements”.

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, in (b)(3), substituted “grants, losses on a project or development to the extent financed with state or federal grants or appropriations, mark-to-market fair value based accounting entries, and noncash accounting entries related to retirement obligations” for “grants, or impairment losses on development projects financed under AS

44.88.172

” at the end, added (b)(4) and (5) [now (b)(2) and (b)(4)].

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5,
ch. 121, SLA 2002, provides that the 2002 amendments to paragraphs (b)(2) and (3) [now (b)(3) and (b)(5)] “first apply to calculations made for base fiscal year 2002 and apply thereafter.”

Section 3,
ch. 75, SLA 2003, provides that the 2003 amendments of (b)(2) and (3) [now (b)(3) and (b)(5)] of this section apply to calculations under this section beginning with state fiscal year 2004, using base fiscal year 2002.

Sec. 44.88.090.
Bonds of the authority.

The authority may borrow money and may issue bonds, including but not limited to bonds on which the principal and interest are payable

exclusively from the income and receipts or other money derived from the project or development project financed with the proceeds of the bonds or derived from the exporter or exporting transaction financed, guaranteed, or insured with the proceeds of the bonds;

exclusively from the income and receipts or other money derived from designated projects or development projects or other sources whether or not they are financed, insured, or guaranteed in whole or in part with the proceeds of the bonds; or

from its income and receipts or other assets generally, or a designated part or parts of them.

Bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the authority, and be dated and shall mature as the resolution may provide, except that a bond may not mature more than 40 years from the date of its issue. Bonds shall bear interest at the rate or rates, be in the denominations, be in the form, either coupon or registered, carry the registration privileges, be executed in the manner, be payable in the medium of payment, at the place or places, and be subject to the terms of redemption which the resolution or a subsequent resolution may provide.

All bonds, regardless of form or character, shall be negotiable instruments for all the purposes of AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code).

All bonds may be sold at public or private sale in the manner, for the price or prices, and at the time or times which the authority may determine.

Before issuing bonds, the authority shall provide for consideration at least sufficient, in the judgment of the authority, to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds as they become due and to create and maintain the reserves for the payments that the authority considers necessary or desirable, and to meet all obligations in connection with the lease or agreement and all costs necessary to service the bonds, unless the lease or agreement provides that the obligations are to be met or costs are to be paid by a party other than the authority. If the bonds are being issued to finance a project or projects under AS

44.88.155

—

44.88.159

, then the consideration shall be provided by lease or other agreement regarding the project or projects. If the bonds are being issued to finance a development project or development projects under AS

44.88.172

—

44.88.177

, then the consideration shall be provided by lease or other agreement regarding the development project or development projects.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine suits, actions, or proceedings relating to the authority, including suits, actions, or proceedings brought to foreclose or otherwise enforce a mortgage, pledge, assignment, or security interest or brought by or for the benefit or security of a holder of its bonds or by a trustee for or other representative of the holders.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

The authority may combine, for the purposes of a single offering, bonds financing more than one project or development project under AS

44.88.155

—

44.88.159

or

44.88.172

—

44.88.177

.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am §§ 60, 61 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 35 ch 115 SLA 1981; am §§ 13 — 16 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 162 SLA 1988; am §§ 7, 23 ch 123 SLA 1990; am §§ 1, 2 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.090. Renumbered in 1980. In 1993 under § 13, ch. 34, SLA 1993 and § 128, ch. 35, SLA 1993 the citation to the Uniform Commercial Code was revised.

In 2000, “AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Cross references. —

For a provision authorizing issuance of bonds before June 30, 2023 to finance a liquefied natural gas production plant on the North Slope and distribution system in Interior Alaska, see sec. 11,
ch. 26, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts, as amended by sec. 12, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provisions amending sec. 11, ch. 26, SLA 2013 relating to an Interior natural gas project and providing legislative intent, see secs. 1 and 9 - 10, ch. 39, SLA 2015.

Administrative Code. —

For conduit revenue bond program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 1.

For tax-exempt loan participation program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 2.

For development finance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 5.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning ch. 26, SLA 2013 (SB 23), regarding issuance of bonds to finance a liquefied natural gas production plant on the North Slope and distribution system in Interior Alaska, see 2013 Senate Journal 40 — 42.

Sec. 44.88.095.
Bonding limitations.

The authority may not issue bonds in a 12-month period in an amount that exceeds $400,000,000, excluding refunding bonds.

[Repealed, § 24 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

Before entering into a lease or other agreement under AS

44.88.090(e)

regarding a project for which the authority agrees to issue bonds in an amount in excess of $10,000,000, there must be filed with the authority a certified copy of a resolution of the governing body of the political subdivision of the state, if any, in which the project is to be located, consenting to the location of the project. The consent need only refer to the general nature of the project ultimately to be acquired or financed, as set out in a request of the proposed project applicant. Before entering into a lease or other agreement under AS

44.88.090(e)

regarding a project, the authority shall find, on the basis of all information reasonably available to it, that

the project and its development under this chapter will be economically advantageous to the state and the general public welfare and will contribute to the economic growth of the state;

the project applicant is financially responsible;

provision to meet increased demand on public facilities that might result from the project is reasonably assured; and

the project will provide, or retain, employment reasonably related to the amount of the financing by the authority, considering the amount of investment for each employee for comparable facilities and other relevant factors.

Before adopting a resolution approving a project to be financed under AS

44.88.172

for which bonds must be issued, the authority shall, on the basis of all information reasonably available to it, make findings, with respect to the project, as described in (c)(1) — (4) of this section, and also find that

the project is economically and financially feasible and able to produce revenue adequate to repay the bonds or loans with which it is financed;

the project complies with applicable law; and

issuance of the bonds is not expected to adversely affect the ability of the state or any political subdivision of the state to market other bonds.

Before entering into an agreement to finance or to develop a proposed project financed under AS

44.88.172

for which bonds must be issued, the authority shall obtain the approval of each Regional Resource Advisory Council appointed under AS

44.88.174

or municipality in the area in which the proposed project is to be located. Approval under this subsection must be evidenced by a certified copy of a resolution of the council or of the governing body of the municipality. Before considering a resolution regarding the approval or rejection of the development or financing of a proposed project under this subsection, a Regional Resource Advisory Council shall conduct a public hearing in the region. If a proposed project is located in a municipality, the governing body of the municipality shall conduct a hearing on the proposed project.

Before entering into an agreement to finance or to develop a proposed project financed under AS

44.88.172

for which bonds must be issued, the authority shall compile and make available to the public a document that summarizes the projected economic, social, and environmental effects of the project; and, in conjunction with the Department of Fish and Game, the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Environmental Conservation, and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the authority shall conduct a public hearing on the projected effects of the project.

The authority may issue bonds in an amount greater than $25,000,000 to assist in the financing of a development project under AS

44.88.172

—

44.88.177

only if approved by the legislature, excluding refunding bonds. Refunding bonds may be issued without further approval by the legislature in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for the payment of all bonds to be refunded by them and, in addition, for the payment of all other amounts that the authority considers appropriate in connection with the refunding, including expenses incident to the redeeming, calling, retiring, or paying of the outstanding bonds, the funding of reserves, and the issuance of the refunding bonds.

History.

(§§ 8, 9, 24 ch 123 SLA 1990; am §§ 3, 4 ch 51 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 111 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 109 SLA 1998; am § 8 ch 117 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 2003; am §§ 3, 4 ch 71 SLA 2010; am §§ 2, 3 ch 39 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (f) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For provision giving legislative approval required under (g) of this section to refunding outstanding bonds to finance acquisition of the Snettisham hydroelectric project and related assets, see § 1, ch. 67, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision giving legislative approval required under (g) of this section to expansion and improvement of the Skagway Ore Terminal, see § 16, ch. 7, SLA 2011, in the 2011 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a provision excluding bonds financing a liquefied natural gas production plant on the North Slope and distribution system in Interior Alaska issued before June 30, 2023 from the limitations of this section, see sec. 11,
ch. 26, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts, as amended by sec. 12, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision giving legislative approval required under (g) of this section for the issuance of bonds to finance the infrastructure and construction costs of the Bokan-Dotson Ridge rare earth element project, see sec. 5, ch. 20, SLA 2014, in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision giving legislative approval required under (g) of this section for the issuance of bonds to finance the infrastructure and construction costs of the Niblack project, including mineral processing mill, associated dock, and loading and related infrastructure facilities at the Gravina Island Industrial Complex, as well as infrastructure at the project site on Prince of Wales Island, see sec. 6, ch. 20, SLA 2014, in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provisions amending sec. 11, ch. 26, SLA 2013 and providing legislative intent, see secs. 1 and 9 - 10, ch. 39, SLA 2015.

For provision excluding bonds financing "the infrastructure and construction costs of the Sweetheart Lake hydroelectric project" in an amount "not exceed $120,000,000" from the limitations of this section, see sec. 1, ch. 37, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For conduit revenue bond program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 1.

For tax-exempt loan participation program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 2.

For development finance program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 12, 2010, in (a), added “, excluding refunding bonds” following “$400,000,000”; in (g), substituted “The authority” for “Before July 1, 2007, the authority”, and substituted “if approved by law, excluding refunding bonds. Refunding bonds may be issued without further approval by law in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for the payment of all bonds to be refunded by them and, in addition, for the payment of all other amounts that the authority considers appropriate in connection with the refunding, including expenses incident to the redeeming, calling, retiring, or paying of the outstanding bonds, the funding of reserves, and the issuance of the refunding bonds” for “with legislative approval. Beginning July 1, 2007, and thereafter, without prior legislative approval, the authority may not issue bonds, except refunding and conduit revenue bonds”.

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (c), in the introductory language, substituted “amount in excess of $10,000,000” for “amount in excess of $6,000,000”, and inserted “or financed” following “project ultimately to be acquired”, made stylistic changes in (c)(3) and (c)(4); in (g), substituted “greater than $25,000,000” for “greater than $10,000,000” and twice substituted “the legislature” for “law”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 71, SLA 2010 (HB 90), amending (a) and (g) of this section, see 2009 House Journal 95 — 97.

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning
ch. 39, SLA 2015 (HB 105), see 2015 House Journal 188 — 192.

Sec. 44.88.100.
Trust indentures and trust agreements.

In the discretion of the authority, an issue of bonds may be secured by a trust indenture or trust agreement between the authority and a corporate trustee (which may be a trust company, bank, or national banking association, with corporate trust powers, located inside or outside the state) or by a secured loan agreement or other instrument or under a resolution giving powers to a corporate trustee (hereinafter in this section referred to as “trust agreement”) by means of which the authority may

make and enter into any and all the covenants and agreements with the trustee or the holders of the bonds which the authority may determine to be necessary or desirable, including, without limitation, covenants, provisions, limitations, and agreements as to

the application, investment, deposit, use, and disposition of the proceeds of bonds of the authority or of money or other property of the authority or in which it has an interest;

the fixing and collection of rents or other consideration for and the other terms to be incorporated in a lease or contract of sale of a project or development project financed under AS

44.88.155

—

44.88.159

or

44.88.172

—

44.88.177

;

the assignment by the authority of its rights in the lease or contract of sale of a project or development project financed under AS

44.88.155

—

44.88.159

or

44.88.172

—

44.88.177

or in a mortgage or other security interest created with respect to a project or development project financed under AS 44.88.155 — 44.88.159 or 44.88.172 — 44.88.177 to a trustee for the benefit of bondholders;

the terms and conditions upon which additional bonds of the authority may be issued;

the vesting in a trustee of rights, powers, duties, funds, or property in trust for the benefit of bondholders, including, without limitation, the right to enforce payment, performance, and all other rights of the authority or of the bondholders under a lease, contract of sale, mortgage, security agreement, or trust agreement with respect to a project or development project financed under AS 44.88.155 — 44.88.159 or 44.88.172 — 44.88.177 by mandamus or other proceeding or by taking possession of by agent or otherwise and operating a project or facility and collecting rents or other consideration and applying the same in accordance with the trust agreement;

pledge, mortgage, or assign money, leases, agreements, property, or other assets of the authority either presently in hand or to be received in the future, or both; and

provide for any other matters of like or different character which in any way affect the security or protection of the bonds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am § 17 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 4 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.100. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.88.105.
Capital reserve funds and capital reserve fund requirement.

For the purpose of securing one or more issues of its bonds, the authority may establish one or more special funds, called “capital reserve funds”, and shall pay into those capital reserve funds the proceeds of the sale of its bonds and other money which may be made available to the authority from other sources for the purposes of the capital reserve funds. A capital reserve fund may be established only if the authority determines that the establishment of the fund would enhance the marketability of the bonds. Money in a capital reserve fund, except as provided in this section, may be used as required only for (1) the payment of the principal of, and interest on, bonds or of the sinking fund payments with respect to those bonds; (2) the purchase or redemption of the bonds; or (3) the payment of a redemption premium required to be paid when the bonds are redeemed before maturity. However, money in a capital reserve fund may not be withdrawn if the withdrawal would reduce the amount in the capital reserve fund to less than the capital reserve fund requirement, except for the purpose of making payment, when due, of principal, interest, redemption premiums on the bonds, and sinking fund payments when other money of the authority is not available for the payments. Income or interest earned by, or increment to, a capital reserve fund, from the investment of all or part of the fund, may be transferred by the authority to other funds or accounts of the authority if the transfer does not reduce the amount of the capital reserve fund below the capital reserve fund requirement.

If the authority decides to issue bonds secured by a capital reserve fund, the bonds may not be issued if the amount in the capital reserve fund is less than the capital reserve fund requirement, unless the authority, at the time of issuance of the bonds, deposits in the capital reserve fund from the proceeds of the bonds to be issued or from other sources, an amount which, together with the amount then in the fund, is not less than the capital reserve fund requirement.

In computing the amount of a capital reserve fund for the purpose of this section, securities in which all or a portion of the fund is invested shall be valued by a reasonable method established by the authority by resolution. Valuation shall include the amount of interest earned or accrued as of the date of the valuation.

The chair of the authority shall annually, not later than January 2, certify in writing to the governor and the legislature the amount, if any, required to restore a capital reserve fund to the capital reserve fund requirement. The legislature may appropriate to the authority the amount certified by the chair of the authority. The authority shall deposit the amounts appropriated under this subsection during a fiscal year in the proper capital reserve fund. Nothing in this section creates a debt or liability of the state. In this subsection, “capital reserve fund” means a capital reserve fund that

is created under this section on or before January 1, 1989;

secures refunding bonds if the refunding bonds are issued to refund bonds that are secured by a capital reserve fund created under this section on or before January 1, 1989;

secures bonds issued on or after August 11, 1993, for a power transmission intertie; or

secures bonds issued on or after July 1, 2013, for a qualified energy development project financed under AS

44.88.650

—

44.88.690

.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

The authority may establish reserve funds, other than capital reserve funds, to secure one or more issues of its bonds. The authority may deposit in a reserve fund established under this subsection the proceeds of sale of its bonds and other money which may be made available from any other source. A reserve fund established under this subsection must comply with (a) — (c) of this section. The authority may allow a reserve fund established under this subsection to be depleted without complying with (d) of this section.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 123 SLA 1990.]

In this section, “capital reserve fund requirement” means the amount required to be on deposit in the capital reserve fund as of the date of computation as determined by resolution of the authority.

History.

(§ 62 ch 106 SLA 1980; am §§ 36, 37 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 6 ch 162 SLA 1984; am § 18 ch 42 SLA 1987; am §§ 10, 11, 23 ch 123 SLA 1990; am § 23 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 7 ch 26 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.61.105. Renumbered in 1980. Reorganized in 1987 to place the definition at the end of the section.

Cross references. —

For a provision authorizing a capital reserve fund to secure bonds issued before June 30, 2023 to finance a liquefied natural gas production plant on the North Slope and distribution system in Interior Alaska, see sec. 11,
ch. 26, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts, as amended by sec. 12, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective May 30, 2013, in the introductory language of (d), substituted “chair” for “chairman” twice, added (d)(4), and made a related change.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning ch. 26, SLA 2013 (SB 23), regarding use of a capital reserve fund to secure bonds issued to finance a liquefied natural gas production plant on the North Slope and distribution system in Interior Alaska, see 2013 Senate Journal 40 — 42.

Sec. 44.88.110.
Validity of pledge.

It is the intention of the legislature that a pledge made in respect of bonds shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made; that the money or property so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery or further act; and that the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority irrespective of whether the parties have notice. Neither the resolution, trust agreement, nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded or filed under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code to be valid, binding, or effective against the parties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.110. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.88.120.
Nonliability on bonds.

Neither the members of the authority nor a person executing the bonds are liable personally on the bonds or are subject to personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the bonds.

The bonds issued by the authority do not constitute an indebtedness or other liability of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, except the authority, but shall be payable solely from the income and receipts or other funds or property of the authority. The authority may not pledge the faith or credit of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, except the authority, to the payment of a bond and the issuance of a bond by the authority does not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate the state or a political subdivision of the state to apply money from, or levy or pledge any form of taxation whatever to the payment of the bond.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.120. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.88.130.
Pledge of the state.

The state pledges to and agrees with the holders of bonds issued under this chapter and with the federal agency that lends or contributes funds in respect to a project or development project financed under AS

44.88.155

—

44.88.159

or

44.88.172

—

44.88.177

that the state will not limit or alter the rights and powers vested in the authority by this chapter to fulfill the terms of a contract made by the authority with the holders or federal agency and that the state will not in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the bonds, together with the interest on them with interest on unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with an action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders are fully met and discharged. The authority is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state, insofar as it refers to holders of bonds of the authority, in a contract with the holders and, insofar as it relates to a federal agency, in a contract with the federal agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am § 19 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 5 ch 109 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.130. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.88.140.
Exemption from taxation.

Except as provided in AS

29.45.030(a)(1)

, the real and personal property of the authority and its assets, income, and receipts are declared to be the property of a political subdivision of the state and, together with any project or development project financed under AS

44.88.155

—

44.88.159

or

44.88.172

—

44.88.177

, and a leasehold interest created in a project or development project financed under AS

44.88.155

—

44.88.159

or

44.88.172

—

44.88.177

, devoted to an essential public and governmental function and purpose, and the property, assets, income, receipts, project, development project, and leasehold interests shall be exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the state or a political subdivision of the state, including, without limitation, all boroughs, cities, municipalities, school districts, public utility districts, and other taxing units. All bonds of the authority are declared to be issued by a political subdivision of the state and for an essential public and governmental purpose and to be a public instrumentality, and the bonds, and the interest on them, the income from them and the transfer of the bonds, and all assets, income, and receipts pledged to pay or secure the payments of the bonds, or interest on them, shall at all times be exempt from taxation by or under the authority of the state, except for inheritance and estate taxes and taxes on transfers by or in contemplation of death. Nothing in this section affects or limits an exemption from license fees, property taxes, or excise, income, or any other taxes, provided under any other law, nor does it create a tax exemption with respect to the interest of any business enterprise or other person, other than the authority, in any property, assets, income, receipts, project, development project, or lease whether or not financed under this chapter. By January 10 of each year, the authority shall submit to the governor a report describing the nature and extent of the tax exemption of the property, assets, income, receipts, project, development project, and leasehold interests of the authority under this section. The authority shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

An applicant or proposed applicant under this chapter and the local political subdivision may enter into agreements providing for payments in lieu of taxes, computed on a formula basis or otherwise. The agreement may provide that the payments be made to the local political subdivision or to any other taxing unit of the state including, without limitation, a borough, city, municipality, school district or public utility district, the area of which is coterminous in whole or in part with that of the local political subdivision.

[Repealed, § 126 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

In this section, “local political subdivision” means the political subdivision of the state in which a project or development project financed under AS

44.88.155

—

44.88.159

or

44.88.172

—

44.88.177

is or is to be located.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967; am § 3 ch 64 SLA 1977; am §§ 63, 64 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 126 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 20 ch 42 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 85 SLA 1991; am § 101 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 9, 10 ch 117 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.140. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.88.150.
Bonds legal investments for fiduciaries.

The bonds of the authority are securities in which all public officers and bodies of the state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, savings associations, including savings and loan associations and building and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest funds including capital in their control or belonging to them. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the bonds of the authority are also securities which may be deposited with and may be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the state is now or may hereafter be authorized.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1967)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.61.150. Renumbered in 1980.

Administrative Code. —

For tax-exempt loan participation program, see 3 AAC 99, art. 2.